apertium-sme-sma.sma.lexc
LEXICON VSUF-VI-EVEN-PRS
 :e	          V-PRS-SG-1 ;
 	          V-PRS-SG-2 ;
 +Sg3:ie     	  FINAL1 ;
! :ie		  VSUF-EVEN-PRS-DUPL ;
 +Du1:ien         FINAL1	;
 +Du2:eden	  FINAL1	; !i>0
 +Du2:ijidien	  FINAL1	; !i>0
 +Du3:ijægan	  FINAL1	; !e>0
 +Pl1:ebe	  FINAL1	; !i>0
 +Pl1:ijibie	  FINAL1	; !i>0
 +Pl2:ijidie	  FINAL1	; !i>0
 +Pl2:ede	  FINAL1	; !i>0
 +Pl3:ieh         FINAL1	;



! Odd

LEXICON VSUF-ODD-PRS
    V-ODD-PRS-SG ;
    V-ODD-PRS-DUPL ;

LEXICON V-ODD-PRS-SG
 :%^DISIMPe V-PRS-SG-1 ;
 :%^DISIMP  V-PRS-SG-2 ;
 :%^DISIMPe V-PRS-SG-3 ;

LEXICON V-ODD-PRS-DUPL
 ODD_PRS_NON_DU3 ;
 ODD_PRS_DU3 ;

LEXICON ODD_PRS_NON_DU3
 +Du1:ien		FINAL1	;
 +Du2:idien		FINAL1	;
 +Pl1:ibie		FINAL1	;
 +Pl2:idie		FINAL1	;
 +Pl3:ieh		FINAL1	;

LEXICON ODD_PRS_DU3
 +Du3:ægan		FINAL1	;

LEXICON VSUF-ODD-PRT
VSUF-PRT-SG-12 ;
VSUF-PRT-SG-3 ;
VSUF-PRT-DUPL ;

LEXICON VSUF-ODD-IMP
 +Sg2:%^DISIMPh	FINAL1  ;
 +Du2:idien       FINAL1  ;
 +Pl2:idie        FINAL1  ;


! Contract


! LEXICON VSUF-CONTR-PRS
!      :e  V-PRS-SG-1 ;
!      :   V-PRS-SG-2 ;
!      :ie V-PRS-SG-3 ;
!            VSUF-CONTR-DUPL ;
! 
! LEXICON VSUF-CONTR-DUPL
!  +Du1:ien		FINAL1	;
!  +Du2:eden		FINAL1	;
! ! Dual third does not get an +CTR tag
!  +Pl1:ebe		FINAL1	;
!  +Pl2:ede		FINAL1	;
!  +Pl3:ieh		FINAL1	;
! 
! LEXICON VSUF-CONTR-PRT
!          VSUF-PRT-SG-12 ;
!          VSUF-PRT-DUPL ;
! 
! LEXICON VSUF-CONTR-IMP
!  +Sg2:h    FINAL1  ;
!  +Du2:eden FINAL1  ;
!  +Pl2:ede  FINAL1  ;


! Common even-odd-contr
! ---------------------

LEXICON V-PRS-SG-12 ! Kutt denne viss ikkje ref til
 V-PRS-SG-1 ;
 V-PRS-SG-2 ;

LEXICON V-PRS-SG-1
 +Sg1:m			FINAL1	; ! Border in prev lex

LEXICON V-PRS-SG-2
 +Sg2:h		FINAL1	;

LEXICON V-PRS-SG-3
 +Sg3:  		FINAL1	;

LEXICON VSUF-PRT
 VSUF-PRT-SG-12 ;
 VSUF-PRT-SG-3 ;
 VSUF-PRT-DUPL ;
 


LEXICON VSUF-PRT-SG-12
+Sg1:im		FINAL1	;
+Sg2:ih		FINAL1	;

LEXICON VSUF-PRT-SG-3
+Sg3:i		FINAL1	;
 +Sg3+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPi		FINAL1	; !


LEXICON VSUF-PRT-DUPL
+Du1:imen		FINAL1	;
+Du2:iden		FINAL1	;
+Du3:igan		FINAL1	;
+Pl1:imh		FINAL1	;
+Pl2:idh		FINAL1	;
+Pl3:in		    FINAL1	;




!LEXICON V-II-PRS-DUPL
! :oe		    VSUF-EVEN-PRS-DUPL ;
! +Du1:oen      FINAL1	;
! +Du2:oden		FINAL1	; !e>0
! +Du3:oejægan	FINAL1	;
! +Pl1:obe		FINAL1	; !e>0
! +Pl2:ode		FINAL1	; !e>0
! +Pl3:oeh		FINAL1	;

!LEXICON V-III-PRS-DUPL
! :a			VSUF-EVEN-PRS-DUPL ;
! +Du1:an       FINAL1	;
! +Du2:eden		FINAL1	; !a>e
! +Du3:ajægan	FINAL1	;
! +Pl1:ebe		FINAL1	; !a>e
! +Pl2:ede		FINAL1	; !a>e
! +Pl3:ah		FINAL1	;

! From V verbs
! +Du1:oen       FINAL1	; !'e>oe
! +Du2:eden		FINAL1	;
! +Du3:ijægan	FINAL1	; !e>i
! +Pl1:ebe		FINAL1	;
! +Pl2:ede		FINAL1	;
! +Pl3:oeh		FINAL1	; !'e>oe

!! LEXICON V-EVEN-PRS
!!   V-PRS-SG-12 ;
!!   V-PRS-SG-3 ;
!!    V-EVEN-PRS-DUPL ;

!LEXICON V-EVEN-PRS-DUPL
! :ie		VSUF-EVEN-PRS-DUPL ;
! +Du1:ien       FINAL1	;
! +Du2:eden		FINAL1	; !i>0
! +Du3:iejægan	FINAL1	;
! +Pl1:ebe		FINAL1	; !i>0
! +Pl2:ede		FINAL1	; !i>0
! +Pl3:ieh		FINAL1	;






! Final lexicon
! =============


LEXICON FINAL1
 ENDLEX ;
 +Foc/ge+Use/Circ:#ge ENDLEX ; !
 +Foc/gan+Use/Circ:#gan ENDLEX ; !
 +Foc/gih+Use/Circ:#gih ENDLEX ;	!
 +Foc/gænnah+Use/Circ:#gænnah ENDLEX ;	!

LEXICON ENDLEX
   @D.NeedNoun.ON@ # ;


! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify

! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

LEXICON FirstComponent
aajkohke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:aajkohk R ; !
aehtjie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:aehtj R ; !
bæjngolds+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:bæjngolds R ; !
dåarehtje+N+Sg+Nom+CmpN/SgN:dåarehtje R ; !
iehkede+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:iehkeds R ; !
jåvle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:jåvle R ; !
jåvlh+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:jåvlh R ; !
luhkie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:luhkie R ; !
maadter+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:maadter R ; !
maake+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:maake R ; !
skïemtje+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:skïemtje R ; !
tjidtjie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:tjidtj R ; !
tsåelhkie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:tsåelhkie R ; !
veete+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:veete R ; !
vuentiemie+N+Sg+Nom+CmpN/SgN?:vuentiemie R ; !
åarjel+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:åarjel R ; !


LEXICON VNAME_ODD ! Names ending in stressless vowel
+N+Prop+Sg: N_ODD_SG ;
+N+Prop+Pl: N_ODD_PL ;
+N+Prop:    N_ODD_ESS ;
+N+Prop+Attr:e%^DISIMP FINAL1 ;

!LEXICON VNAME_EVEN ! Names ending in stressless vowel
!+N+Prop+Sg: NIEJTE_SG ;
!+N+Prop+Pl: NIEJTE_PL ;
!+N+Prop:    EVEN_ESS ;
!+N+Prop+Attr:e FINAL1 ;

LEXICON VNAME
 +N+Prop+Sg+Nom:          FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Sg+Acc:%>m       FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>n       FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>se      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Sg+Ine:%>sne     FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Sg+Ela:%>ste     FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Sg+Com:%>jne      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Pl+Nom:%>h       FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Pl+Acc:%>jde      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>j       FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Pl+Ill:%>jde      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Pl+Ine:%>jne      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Pl+Ela:%>jste    FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Pl+Com:%>jgujmie  FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Ess:%>jne         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Attr: FINAL1 ;
!SNAME_NIEJTE ; ! Even syllable as default - rename using either VNAME_ODD, or
! the appropriate even syllable lexicons.

LEXICON NYSTØ ! Names ending in stressed vowel, typically scand. compounds 
 SNAME_NIEJTE ; ! check whether this is correct!
+N+Prop+Attr: FINAL1 ;



LEXICON INAME ! Names ending in stressless vowel
 +N+Prop+Sg+Nom:i          FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Sg+Acc:i%>m       FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Sg+Gen:i%>n       FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Sg+Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Sg+Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Sg+Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Sg+Com:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Pl+Nom:i%>h       FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Pl+Acc:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>ij       FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Pl+Ill:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Pl+Ine:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Pl+Ela:%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Pl+Com:%>igujmie  FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Ess:%>ine         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Attr:i FINAL1 ;
 
LEXICON OENAME
SNAME_NIEJTE ;

LEXICON ONAME
 VNAME ; !until we get answer from SGM
 +N+Prop+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:           FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +N+Prop+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:e%>m       FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +N+Prop+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:e%>n       FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +N+Prop+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:%>m        FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +N+Prop+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:%>n        FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +N+Prop+Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:%>se       FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +N+Prop+Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:%>sne      FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +N+Prop+Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:%>ste      FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +N+Prop+Sg+Com+Use/Sub:%>jne      FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM

! the sne / snie business remains to be sorted out.

LEXICON UENAME
SNAME_NIEJTE ;

LEXICON UNAME
 VNAME ; !until we get answer from SGM
 +Use/Sub: UNAME_EVEN ; ! !until we get answer from SGM

LEXICON UNAME_EVEN !SUB (sub lexicon names as well, or the code breaks)
 +N+Prop+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:          FINAL1 ;  ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +N+Prop+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:ve%>m       FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +N+Prop+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:ve%>n       FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +N+Prop+Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:ve%>se       FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +N+Prop+Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:ve%>sne      FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +N+Prop+Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:ve%>ste      FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
 +N+Prop+Sg+Com+Use/Sub:ve%>jne      FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
  

LEXICON Adjective
gamte+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Attr:gemtie%>b%»odtje FINAL1 ; ! e(1)-stamme
gamte+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pred:gemtie%>b%»odtje FINAL1 ; ! e(1)-stamme
gamte+A+Superl+Attr:gemtie%>%^COMPDISIMPmes FINAL1 ; ! e(1)-stamme
löövles+A+Comp+Attr:lïevle%>%^COMPDISIMPbe FINAL1 ; ! e(3)-stamme
löövles+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Attr:lïevle%>b%»odtje FINAL1 ; ! e(3)-stamme
löövles+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pred:lïevle%>b%»odtje FINAL1 ; ! e(3)-stamme
löövles+A+Superl+Attr:löövle%>%^COMPDISIMPmes FINAL1 ; ! e(3)-stamme
noere+A+Comp+Attr:nuerie%>%^COMPDISIMPbe FINAL1 ; !e(1)-stamme
noere+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Attr:nuerie%>b%»odtje FINAL1 ; ! e(1)-stamme
noere+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pred:nuerie%>b%»odtje FINAL1 ; ! e(1)-stamme
noere+A+Superl+Attr:nööre%>%^COMPDISIMPmes FINAL1 ; ! e(1)-stamme
orre+A+Comp+Attr:urre%>%^COMPDISIMPbe FINAL1 ; ! e(1)-stamme eller e(2)-stamme 
orre+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Attr:urre%>b%»odtje FINAL1 ; ! e(1)-stamme eller e(2)-stamme 
orre+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pred:urre%>b%»odtje FINAL1 ; ! e(1)-stamme eller e(2)-stamme 
orre+A+Superl+Attr:urre%>%^COMPDISIMPmes FINAL1 ; ! e(1)-stamme eller e(2)-stamme 
plaave+A+Comp+Attr:plaevie%>%^COMPDISIMPbe FINAL1 ; ! e(1)-stamme
plaave+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Attr:plaevie%>b%»odtje FINAL1 ; ! e(1)-stamme
plaave+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pred:plaevie%>b%»odtje FINAL1 ; ! e(1)-stamme
plaave+A+Superl+Attr:plaave%>%^COMPDISIMPmes FINAL1 ; ! e(1)-stamme
rööpses+A+Comp+Attr:ruepsie%>%^COMPDISIMPbe FINAL1 ; ! e(3)-stamme
rööpses+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Attr:ruepsie%>b%»odtje FINAL1 ; ! e(3)-stamme
rööpses+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dim+Pred:ruepsie%>b%»odtje FINAL1 ; ! e(3)-stamme
rööpses+A+Superl+Attr:rööpse%>%^COMPDISIMPmes FINAL1 ; ! e(3)-stamme
LEXICON Demonstrative
dïhte+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom:dïhte FINAL1 ;  
dïhte+Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen:dan FINAL1 ;    
dïhte+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ine:dennie FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Dem+Sg+Com:dejnie FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Dem+Pl+Acc:dejtie FINAL1 ;  
dïhte+Pron+Dem+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:dej FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ine:dejnie FINAL1 ;  
dïhte+Pron+Dem+Pl+Com:dej FINAL1 ; ! Problem: Gen (as in sme) or own Com ??
daate+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom:daate FINAL1 ;
daate+Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen:daan FINAL1 		;
daate+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill:daase FINAL1 		;
daate+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ela:daestie FINAL1 	;
daate+Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom:daah FINAL1 		;
daate+Pron+Dem+Pl+Gen:daaj FINAL1 		;
daate+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ill:daejtie FINAL1 	;
daate+Pron+Dem+Pl+Com+Use/NG:daejgujmie FINAL1 ;
doete+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill:doese FINAL1 ;
doete+Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom:doeh FINAL1 ;
doete+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ill:duejtie FINAL1 ;
doete+Pron+Dem+Pl+Com+Use/NG:doejgujmie FINAL1 ;
dohte+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill:dosse FINAL1 ;
dohte+Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom:doh FINAL1 ;
dohte+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ill:dujtie FINAL1 ;
dohte+Pron+Dem+Pl+Com+Use/NG:dyjgujmie FINAL1 ;
LEXICON Interrogative
gie+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen:gïen FINAL1 ;
gie+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom:gïeh FINAL1 ;
guhte+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom:guhte FINAL1 ;
guhte+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine:guhtesne FINAL1 ;
guhte+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc:guhtide FINAL1 ;
guhte+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ela:guhtijste FINAL1 ;
mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen:man FINAL1 ;
mij+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom:mah FINAL1 ;
mij+Pron+Interr+Pl+Com+Use/NG:mejgujmie FINAL1 ;
gåabpa+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom:gåabpa        FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpa+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine:gåabpesne     FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpetje+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc:gåabpetjem    FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpetje+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela:gåabpatjistie FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gie+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:geam FINAL1 ;
gie+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill+Use/NG:gease FINAL1 ;
gie+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com:geajgujmie FINAL1 ;
guhte+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill:guhtese FINAL1 ;
guhte+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom:guhth FINAL1 ;
guhte+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ine:guhtine FINAL1 ;
mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc:maam FINAL1 ;
mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ess:mannasinie FINAL1 ;
mij+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com:majgujmie FINAL1 ;
magkere+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom:magkerh FINAL1 ;
gåabpa+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill:gåabpese      FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpetje+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom:gåabpetje     FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
gåabpetje+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ine:gåabpatjisnie FINAL1 "hvilken (av to)" ;
LEXICON Indefinite
jeenjemes+Pron+Indef+Nom:jeenjemes FINAL1 ; !XXX Should these include other tgs too?
jeenjemes+Pron+Indef+Ine:jeenjemese%>sne FINAL1 ;
naaken+Pron+Indef+Nom:naaken FINAL1 ; !XXX
